Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-144
Division; right of eminent domain; procedure.

The division may exercise the right of eminent domain, in the name of the state, for the purpose of acquiring any property which it is authorized to acquire by condemnation. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. The fact that the property so needed has been acquired by the owner under power of eminent domain shall not prevent its acquisition by the division by the exercise of the right of eminent domain conferred in the State Aeronautics Act. The division shall not be precluded from abandoning the condemnation of any such property in any case where possession thereof has not been taken. Nothing in the State Aeronautics Act shall be construed as granting to privately owned public use airports the authority to exercise the power of eminent domain nor shall anything in the State Aeronautics Act be construed as granting to the division or any municipality the authority to exercise the right of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring lands or easements for the sole use or benefit of privately owned public use airports.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 11(4), p. 97;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 26, p. 458;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 11;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 37.